Utah statutes.
17D-1-501.   Provisions applicable to a special service district's issuance of bonds.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter:

(1)  each special service district that issues bonds shall:

(a)  issue them as provided in, as applicable:

(i)  Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act; or

(ii)  Title 11, Chapter 42, Assessment Area Act; and

(b)  receive the benefits of Title 11, Chapter 30, Utah Bond Validation Act; and

(2)  each special service district that issues refunding bonds shall issue them as provided in Title 11, Chapter 27, Utah Refunding Bond Act.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

